Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 36 Arbitration
§ 1-36-116.
Judgment upon granting order confirming, modifying or correcting
award; costs and disbursements.

Upon the granting of
an order confirming, modifying or correcting an award, the judgment
shall conform and be enforced as any other judgment. Costs of the
application, proceedings and disbursements may be awarded by the court.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.16; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-37-116.

Cross references. —

As to judgments generally, see chapter 16 of this title.

As to enforcement of judgments, see chapter 17 of this title.

Applied

in

Hot Springs County Sch. Dist. v. Strube Constr. Co., 715 P.2d 540,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Smith, Keller & Assocs. v. Dorr & Assocs., 875 P.2d 1258,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 1-36-117.
Application to court to be by motion; notice and hearing to be in
manner provided by law.

An application to the
court for relief shall be by motion and shall be heard in the manner
provided by law or rule of court. Notice of an initial application
for an order shall be served in the manner provided by law for the
service of a summons in an action unless otherwise specified by the
parties.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.17; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-37-117.

Cross references. —

As to service of summons, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

§ 1-36-118.
Venue upon initial and subsequent applications.

An initial application
shall be made to the court of the county in which the agreement provides
the arbitration hearing shall be held. Otherwise the application shall
be made in the county where the adverse party resides or has a place
of business or, if he has no residence or place of business in this
state, to the court of the county where the adverse party can be served.
All subsequent applications shall be made to the court hearing the
initial application unless the court otherwise directs.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.18; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-37-118.

§ 1-36-119.
Appeals.

An appeal may be taken from:

An order denying the application to compel arbitration;

An order granting an application to stay arbitration;

An order confirming or denying confirmation of an award;

An order modifying or correcting an award;

An order vacating an award without directing a rehearing; or

A final judgment or decree entered by the court.

The appeal shall be taken in the manner of a civil action.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 116, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 1-1048.19; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-37-119.

Cross references. —

As to appeals generally, see Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Severability. —

Section 21, ch. 116, Laws 1959, reads: “If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

Final judgment. —

Court exercised appellate jurisdiction in this case where the district court compelled arbitration because the district court’s order dismissing appellant’s complaint constituted a final judgment. Inman v. Grimmer, 2021 WY 55, 485 P.3d 396,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2021).

Appeal of motion to compel arbitration. —

Appeal from the denial of a motion to compel arbitration was proper because it was a final order of a district court under this section. Fox v. Tanner, 2004 WY 157, 101 P.3d 939,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 2004).

Cited in

Kindred Healthcare Operating, Inc. v. Boyd, 2017 WY 122, 403 P.3d 1014,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2017).

Applied

in

American Nat'l Bank v. Cheyenne Hous. Auth., 562 P.2d 1017,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1977); Althoff, Inc. v. IFG Leasing Co., 704 P.2d 1302,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 532

(Wyo. 1985).

Law reviews. —

For article, Tyler J. Garrett, “Anatomy of a Wyoming AppealA Practitioner’s Guide for Civil Cases, see 16 Wyo. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Appealability of state court's order or decree compelling or refusing to compel arbitration, 6 ALR4th 652.